District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-631.06

Appeals.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3106, 25 DCR 5740
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(z), 45 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-632.6.
1973 Ed., § 1-361.6.